Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-3114
Equipment; lease; contract.

The county board, in addition to other powers granted it by law, may enter into contracts for lease of real or personal property for authorized purposes. Such leases shall not be restricted to a single year and may provide for the purchase of the property in installment payments. This section shall be in addition to and notwithstanding the provisions of sections 23-132 and 23-916.

Laws 1967, c. 115, § 1, p. 363;

R.S.1943, (1983), § 23-324.08;

Laws 1985, LB 393, § 14.